Utah statutes.
59-26-110.   Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee study.

The Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee shall during the 2004 interim:

(1)  study the tax imposed by this chapter;

(2)  recommend whether legislation should be drafted to modify any provision of this chapter; and

(3)  prepare any legislation that the Revenue and Taxation Interim Committee recommends in accordance with Subsection (2) for consideration by the Legislature during the 2005 General Session.

